Nebraska, session 109, LB209.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 77-202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-202 (1) The following property shall be exempt from property taxes:
(a) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions to the extent
used or being developed for use by the state or governmental subdivision for a
public purpose. For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions means (A)
property held in fee title by the state or a governmental subdivision or (B)
property beneficially owned by the state or a governmental subdivision in that
it is used for a public purpose and is being acquired under a lease-purchase
agreement, financing lease, or other instrument which provides for transfer of
legal title to the property to the state or a governmental subdivision upon
payment of all amounts due thereunder. If the property to be beneficially owned
by a governmental subdivision has a total acquisition cost that exceeds the
threshold amount or will be used as the site of a public building with a total
estimated construction cost that exceeds the threshold amount, then such
property shall qualify for an exemption under this section only if the question
of acquiring such property or constructing such public building has been
submitted at a primary, general, or special election held within the
governmental subdivision and has been approved by the voters of the
governmental subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, threshold amount
means the greater of fifty thousand dollars or six-tenths of one percent of the
total actual value of real and personal property of the governmental
subdivision that will beneficially own the property as of the end of the
governmental subdivision's prior fiscal year; and
(ii) Public purpose means use of the property (A) to provide public
services with or without cost to the recipient, including the general operation
of government, public education, public safety, transportation, public works,
civil and criminal justice, public health and welfare, developments by a public
housing authority, parks, culture, recreation, community development, and
cemetery purposes, or (B) to carry out the duties and responsibilities
conferred by law with or without consideration. Public purpose does not include
leasing of property to a private party unless the lease of the property is at
fair market value for a public purpose. Leases of property by a public housing
authority to low-income individuals as a place of residence are for the
authority's public purpose;
(b) Unleased property of the state or its governmental subdivisions which
is not being used or developed for use for a public purpose but upon which a
payment in lieu of taxes is paid for public safety, rescue, and emergency
services and road or street construction or maintenance services to all
governmental units providing such services to the property. Except as provided
in Article VIII, section 11, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the payment in
lieu of taxes shall be based on the proportionate share of the cost of
providing public safety, rescue, or emergency services and road or street
construction or maintenance services unless a general policy is adopted by the
governing body of the governmental subdivision providing such services which
provides for a different method of determining the amount of the payment in
lieu of taxes. The governing body may adopt a general policy by ordinance or
resolution for determining the amount of payment in lieu of taxes by majority
vote after a hearing on the ordinance or resolution. Such ordinance or
resolution shall nevertheless result in an equitable contribution for the cost
of providing such services to the exempt property;
(c) Property owned by and used exclusively for agricultural and
horticultural societies;
(d)(i) Property owned by educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery
organizations, or any organization for the exclusive benefit of any such
educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery organization, and used
exclusively for educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery purposes, when
such property is not (A) owned or used for financial gain or profit to either
the owner or user, (B) used for the sale of alcoholic liquors for more than
twenty hours per week, or (C) owned or used by an organization which
discriminates in membership or employment based on race, color, or national
origin.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (1)(d) of this section:
(A) Educational organization means (I) an institution operated exclusively
-1-

LB209 LB209
2025 2025
for the purpose of offering regular courses with systematic instruction in
academic, vocational, or technical subjects or assisting students through
services relating to the origination, processing, or guarantying of federally
reinsured student loans for higher education, (II) a museum or historical
society operated exclusively for the benefit and education of the public, or
(III) a nonprofit organization that owns or operates a child care facility; and
(B) Charitable organization includes (I) an organization operated
exclusively for the purpose of the mental, social, or physical benefit of the
public or an indefinite number of persons and (II) a fraternal benefit society
organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109.
(iii) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i) of
this section shall apply to any for-profit skilled nursing facility as defined
in section 71-429, for-profit nursing facility as defined in section 71-424, or
for-profit assisted-living facility as defined in section 71-5903 that provides
housing for medicaid beneficiaries, except that the exemption amount for such
property shall be a percentage of the property taxes that would otherwise be
due. Such percentage shall be equal to the average percentage of occupied beds
in the facility provided to medicaid beneficiaries over the most recent three-
year period. This subdivision shall not be construed to modify, limit, or
reduce any property tax exemption provided to a nonprofit skilled nursing
facility, nonprofit nursing facility, or nonprofit assisted-living facility
pursuant to subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section. For purposes of this
subdivision, skilled nursing facility has the same meaning as in section
71-429, nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-424, and
assisted-living facility has the same meaning as in section 71-5903.
(iv) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i) of
this section shall apply to a building that (A) is owned by a charitable
organization, (B) is made available to students in attendance at an educational
institution, and (C) is recognized by such educational institution as approved
student housing, except that the exemption shall only apply to the commons area
of such building, including any common rooms and cooking and eating facilities;
and
(e) Household goods and personal effects not owned or used for financial
gain or profit to either the owner or user.
(2) The increased value of land by reason of shade and ornamental trees
planted along the highway shall not be taken into account in the valuation of
land.
(3) Tangible personal property which is not depreciable tangible personal
property as defined in section 77-119 shall be exempt from property tax.
(4) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers required to be registered
for operation on the highways of this state shall be exempt from payment of
property taxes.
(5) Business and agricultural inventory shall be exempt from the personal
property tax. For purposes of this subsection, business inventory includes
personal property owned for purposes of leasing or renting such property to
others for financial gain only if the personal property is of a type which in
the ordinary course of business is leased or rented thirty days or less and may
be returned at the option of the lessee or renter at any time and the personal
property is of a type which would be considered household goods or personal
effects if owned by an individual. All other personal property owned for
purposes of leasing or renting such property to others for financial gain shall
not be considered business inventory.
(6) Any personal property exempt pursuant to subsection (2) of section
77-4105 or section 77-5209.02 shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(7) Livestock shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(8) Any personal property exempt pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage Act or
the ImagiNE Nebraska Act shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(9) Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind as the fuel source shall be exempt from
the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property. Any
depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source shall be
exempt from the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property
if such depreciable tangible personal property was installed on or after
January 1, 2016, and has a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more.
Depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source
includes, but is not limited to, wind turbines, rotors and blades, towers,
solar panels, trackers, generating equipment, transmission components,
substations, supporting structures or racks, inverters, and other system
components such as wiring, control systems, switchgears, and generator step-up
transformers.
(10) Any tangible personal property that is acquired by a person operating
a data center located in this state, that is assembled, engineered, processed,
fabricated, manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible
personal property, both in component form or that of an assembled product, for
the purpose of subsequent use at a physical location outside this state by the
person operating a data center shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
Such exemption extends to keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power
over tangible personal property in this state for the purpose of subsequently
transporting it outside this state for use thereafter outside this state. For
purposes of this subsection, data center means computers, supporting equipment,
and other organized assembly of hardware or software that are designed to
-2-

LB209 LB209
2025 2025
centralize the storage, management, or dissemination of data and information,
environmentally controlled structures or facilities or interrelated structures
or facilities that provide the infrastructure for housing the equipment, such
as raised flooring, electricity supply, communication and data lines, Internet
access, cooling, security, and fire suppression, and any building housing the
foregoing.
(11) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each person who owns property
required to be reported to the county assessor under section 77-1201 shall be
allowed an exemption amount as provided in the Personal Property Tax Relief
Act. For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each person who owns property
required to be valued by the state as provided in section 77-601, 77-682,
77-801, or 77-1248 shall be allowed a compensating exemption factor as provided
in the Personal Property Tax Relief Act.
(12)(a) Broadband equipment shall be exempt from the personal property tax
if such broadband equipment is:
(i) Deployed in an area funded in whole or in part by funds from the
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, authorized by the federal
Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58; or
(ii) Deployed in a qualified census tract located within the corporate
limits of a city of the metropolitan class and being utilized to provide end-
users with access to the Internet at speeds of at least one hundred megabits
per second for downloading and at least one hundred megabits per second for
uploading.
(b) An owner of broadband equipment seeking an exemption under this
section shall apply for an exemption to the county assessor on or before
December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is to begin.
If the broadband equipment meets the criteria described in this subsection, the
county assessor shall approve the application within thirty calendar days after
receiving the application. The application shall be on forms prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Broadband communications service means telecommunications service as
defined in section 86-121, video programming as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522, as
such section existed on January 1, 2024, or Internet access as defined in
section 1104 of the federal Internet Tax Freedom Act, Public Law 105-277;
(ii) Broadband equipment means machinery or equipment used to provide
broadband communications service and includes, but is not limited to, wires,
cables, fiber, conduits, antennas, poles, switches, routers, amplifiers,
rectifiers, repeaters, receivers, multiplexers, duplexers, transmitters,
circuit cards, insulating and protective materials and cases, power equipment,
backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment, storage devices, modems, and
other general central office or headend equipment, such as channel cards,
frames, and cabinets, or equipment used in successor technologies, including
items used to monitor, test, maintain, enable, or facilitate qualifying
equipment, machinery, software, ancillary components, appurtenances,
accessories, or other infrastructure that is used in whole or in part to
provide broadband communications service. Machinery or equipment used to
produce broadband communications service does not include personal consumer
electronics, including, but not limited to, smartphones, computers, and
tablets; and
(iii) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined in
26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2024.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3506, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3506 (1) All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation
the same as other property, except that there shall be exempt from taxation, on
any homestead described in subsection (2) of this section, one hundred percent
of the exempt amount.
(2) The exemption described in subsection (1) of this section shall apply
to homesteads of:
(a) A veteran who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions), who is
drawing compensation from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
because of (i) one hundred percent service-connected permanent disability or
(ii) assignment of total disability rating for compensation pursuant to 38
C.F.R. 4.16, and who is not eligible for total exemption under sections 77-3526
to 77-3528;
(b) An unremarried surviving spouse of a veteran described in subdivision
(2)(a) of this section or a surviving spouse of such a veteran who remarries
after attaining the age of fifty-seven years;
(c) A veteran who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions), who is
drawing compensation from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
because of one hundred percent service-connected temporary disability, and who
is not eligible for total exemption under sections 77-3526 to 77-3528, an
unremarried spouse of such a veteran, or a surviving spouse of such a veteran
who remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years;
(d) An unremarried surviving spouse of any veteran, including a veteran
other than a veteran described in section 80-401.01, who was discharged or
otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under
honorable conditions) and who died because of a service-connected disability or
a surviving spouse of such a veteran who remarries after attaining the age of
fifty-seven years;
-3-

LB209 LB209
2025 2025
(e) An unremarried surviving spouse of a serviceman or servicewoman,
including a veteran other than a veteran described in section 80-401.01, whose
death while on active duty was service-connected or a surviving spouse of such
a serviceman or servicewoman who remarries after attaining the age of fifty-
seven years; and
(f) An unremarried surviving spouse of a serviceman or servicewoman who
died while on active duty during the periods described in section 80-401.01 or
a surviving spouse of such a serviceman or servicewoman who remarries after
attaining the age of fifty-seven years.
(3) Application for exemption under subdivision (2)(a) of this section
shall be required in every subsequent year evenly divisible by five and shall
include certification of the status described in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. Application for
exemption under subdivision (2)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section shall
be required annually and shall include certification of the status described in
subdivision (2)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs, except that such certification of status
shall only be required in every subsequent year evenly divisible by five.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-202 and 77-3506, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-4-